Illinois, session 104th, HB5769.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Designations Act is amended by adding 5Section 110 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 460/110 new)7    Sec. 110. State beverage. The strawberry milkshake is 8designated the official State beverage of the State of 9Illinois.